Louisiana, session 2026, HB343.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.4(L) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§574.4. Parole; eligibility; juvenile offenders
* * *
L. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person serving
a fixed term or terms of imprisonment that result in a period of incarceration of thirty
years or more and who was at least eighteen years of age but not more than twenty
years of age at the time of the commission of the offense shall be eligible for parole
consideration pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection if all of the following
conditions have been met:
(1) The person is a first-time offender who has not been convicted of any of
the following:
(a) A sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
(b) An offense punishable by life imprisonment.
(2) The offender has served at least twenty-five years of the sentence
imposed.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1107 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 343
(3) The offender has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A major disciplinary
offense is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
(4) The offender has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of prerelease programming in accordance with R.S. 15:827.1.
(5) The offender has completed substance abuse treatment as applicable.
(6) The offender has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(a) A literacy program.
(b) An adult basic education program.
(c) A job skills training program.
(d) A high school equivalency certificate.
(7) The offender has obtained a low-risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections.
(8) The offender has completed a reentry program to be determined by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.